Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3901
Continuing education; purpose.

The purpose of sections 44-3901 to 44-3908 is to establish requirements for continuing education of insurance producers and consultants who are licensed in order to maintain and improve the quality of insurance services provided to the public.

Laws 1982, LB 274, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 21.